Maine, session 132, LD338.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 14 MRSA §1252-A, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 1981, c. 705, Pt. G, §11, is
amended to read:
1. Lists used. The lists of licensed drivers, persons issued an identification card by
the Secretary of State, registered voters from the central voter registration system,
recipients of state unemployment compensation and any person persons who notifies notify
the clerk of the court in the county of their residence and requests request to be put on the
source list of prospective jurors shall must serve as the source for prospective jurors in each
county. These lists may be supplemented with names from other lists specified by the
Supreme Judicial Court.
Sec. 2. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2028.
Page 1 - 132LR0344(05)